Tables/Contraction/de-kurzschrift-1998.ctb
always dabei 145-12
contraction db
always dadurch 145-145
contraction dd
always dafür 145-124
contraction df
always dagegen 145-1245
contraction dg
always daher 145-125
contraction dh
always damit 145-134
contraction dm
always dank 145-13
contraction dk
always davon 145-1236
contraction dv
always dazu 145-1356
contraction dz
always dazubleib 145-1-2-1356-12-12 shouldn't use the dazu-contraction
always dazumal 145-1-2-1356-134
always deuten 145-126-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always deal = dealer
word dei = Agnus Dei
always demokrat 145-2345
contraction dt
word denen 15-14
word dnister 145-1345-24-234-2345-12456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
word denn 145-1345
word dennschon 145-1345-156-135-1345
always dessen 145-2346
always deutsch 145-156
word diem 145-24-12356 we shouldn't use the ie-contraction here
word diese 346-15
word diesen 346-14
word dieser 346-12456
word dieses 346-123456
sufword diesmal 346-134
word dir 145-1235
word doch 145-1456
always druck 145-46
always drück 5-145-46
always dürf 2-145

always eben 15-12-14
word ebenso 15-135
contraction eo
sufword ehemal 15-125-15-134
word ei 6-146
always eigen 146-1245-14 Eigennutz shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always einander 2-1246
word en 15-1345 en passant
always enig 14-45
always erkenn 12456-13-14-1345
sufword etwa 15-1
contraction ea
word etwas 2345-2456
contraction tw

always fahr 2-1235
always fahrtsst 2-1235-2345-234-23456 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always fahrtsstell 2-1235-2345-234-2-13456
always fähr 5-1235
always faehr 5-1235
always fall 124-12345
always fäll 5-124-12345
always faell 5-124-12345
always fertig 124-45
always fest 124-15-23456 should use the st-contraction
always film =
always folgen 124-135-123-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always frag 124-1235
contraction fr
always fragil =
always fragment 124-1235-1-1245-134-14-2345
always freund 124-145
contraction fd
always führ 124-125
contraction fh
always fürcht 124-1256-1235-1456-2345 shouldn't use the für-contraction

always ganz 1245-1356
contraction gz
always gänz 5-1245-1356
always gaenz 5-1245-1356
always garnison 1245-356-1345-24-234-135-1345 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
word gegend 12346-1245-14-145 shouldn't use the gegen-contraction
always gegenüber 1245-1256
contraction gü
always gegenwart 1245-2456
contraction gw
always gegenwärt 5-1245-2456
always gegenwaert 5-1245-2456
always gelb 1245-13456-12 should use the el-contraction
always geld 1245-13456-145 should use the el-contraction
always gelegen 1245-1245
contraction gg
begword gelt 1245-13456-2345 gelten shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword gene 1245-14-15
prfword genem 1245-14-12356
prfword genen 1245-14-14
prfword gener 1245-14-12456
prfword genes 1245-14-123456
always geogra = Geographie shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword gern 1245-12456-1345
midendword gerlich 1245-12456-456 bürgerlich shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always gern 1245-12456-1345 we shouldn't use the ge-contraction here
always geschäft 1245-124
always geschaeft 1245-124
contraction gf
always gesellschaft 1245-156
always geworden 12346-2456
always gibt 1245-12
contraction gb
always gleich 1245-1456
always glück 1245-46
always groß 1245-2346
contraction gß
always größ 5-1245-2346
always grund 1245-145
contraction gd
always gründ 5-1245-145
always gründonners 1245-1235-1256-1345-145-135-1345-1345-12456-234 gründonnerstag shouldn't use the gründ-contraction
always hab 2-125
always haft 125-124
contraction hf
always häft 5-125-124
always haeft 5-125-124
word hain =
always hamburger 125-1-134-12-136-1235-1245-12456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always hand 125-145
always händ 5-125-145
always haend 5-125-145
always halten 125-25-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always hast 125-23456
always hat 125-2345
contraction ht
word hattest 125-15-23456 shouldn't use the es-contraction
word hattrick 125-1-2345-2345-24-46 shouldn't use the hatt-contraction
always haupt 125-1234
contraction hp
always häupt 5-125-1234
always herr 1235-1235
contraction rr
always hier 125-1235
contraction hr
always hierar 125-24-12456-356 hierarchie
always hoff 124-124
contraction ff

word ich 3456
sufword ihn 24-125
always inter 35-2345-12456
always interess 2-35
always irgend 24-1245 irgendetwas
contraction ig

always jahr 245-1235
contraction jr
always jähr 5-245-1235
always jaehr 5-245-1235
always jahrhundert 245-125
contraction jh
always jahrtausend 245-2345
contraction jt
always jahrzehnt 245-1356
contraction jz
sufword jed 245-145
word jedoch 245-1456
sufword jetzig 245-45
always johannisberg 245-135-125-235-1345-24-234-12-12456-1245 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always jung 245-256-1245 shouldn't use the ung-contraction

word kannst 13-23456
always kapital 13-1234
contraction kp
always kapitäl 5-13-1234
always kapitael 5-13-1234
always klemm 13-123-15-1346 eingeklemmt shouldn't use the em-contraction
always knoch 13-1345-135-1456 Knochen shouldn't use the noch-contraction
always komm 13-1346
contraction kx
always akkommod 1-13-13-135-1346-135-145 shouldn't use the komm-contraction
always kömm 5-13-1346
always konnt 13-2345
contraction kt
always könn 2-13
always kräft 5-13-124
always kraeft 5-13-124
always kulturell 13-136-123-2345-136-1235-15-12345 should use the ll-contraction
always kürz 5-13-1356

always lang 123-1245
contraction lg
before g sufword schlan 156-123-235 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
sufword schlangen 156-123-235-1245-14
before g always warteschlan 2456-356-236-156-123-235
always läng 5-123-1245
always laeng 5-123-1245
always jahrelang 245-1235-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrhundertelang 245-125-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrzehntelang 245-1356-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrtausendelang 245-2345-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
before s always jahres 245-1235-123456
before g always jahresta 245-1235-123456-2345-1
always langobard 123-235-1245-135-12-356-145 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
always lass 2-123
always läss 5-123
always laess 5-123
sufword blass 12-123-1-2346
sufword blasst 12-123-1-234-23456
always class = shouldn't use the lass-contraction
before s always glas =
sufword klass 13-123-1-2346 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always lassist 123-1-2346-24-23456
always laich 123-1-24-1456 shouldn't use the ich-contraction
always lasagne = shouldn't use the sag-contraction
always lasso 123-1-2346-135 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always länd =
always laend =
always leb 123-12
contraction lb
always klebeband 13-123-15-23-12-235-145 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
always klebebänder 13-123-15-23-12-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the leb- nor änder-contraction
always leicht 123-1456
always letzt 123-2345
contraction lt
always lieb 123-346-12

always mann 134-1345
contraction mn
always männ 5-134-1345
always maenn 5-134-1345
word manna = shouldn't use the mann-contraction
always mannequin 134-235-1345-15-6-12345-35 shouldn't use the mann-contraction
always maschin 134-156
always material 134-123
contraction ml
always materiell 134-12345
word mir 134-1235
always mittel 134-2345
contraction mt
always moldawien 134-135-123-145-1-2456-24-14 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
sufword moor = shouldn't use the or-contraction
always möchte 1456-15
word möchten 1456-14
always mög 2-246
always möglich 134-456
always musik 134-13
contraction mk
always muss 134-2346
always müss 2-134

word nachdem 1345-145
always nahm 1345-134 Annahme
contraction nm
always natur 1345-2345
contraction nt
always natürlich 1345-456
always nächst 1345-23456
always naechst 1345-23456
always nehm 1345-125
contraction nh
endword nisch 1345-24-156 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nische 1345-24-156-15 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nischen 1345-24-156-14 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nischer 1345-24-156-12456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nisches 1345-24-156-123456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always nichtig 1345-45
always nichts 1345-234
contraction ns
always nichtsehend 2-1345-234-2356-14-145 shouldn't use the nichts-contraction
always nichtschwimm 2-1345-156-2456-24-1346 shouldn't use the nichts-contraction
always noch 1345-1456
always nommen 1345-1346
contraction nx
always genommen 12346-1345-1346
midendword augenommen 16-12346-1345-1346
always eigenommen 146-12346-1345-1346
always notwendig 1345-2456
contraction nw
begmidword normal 1345-26-134-25 shouldn't use the mal-contraction
prfword normal 1345-26-134-1-123 shouldn't use the mal-contraction
always anim 235-24-134 animal shouldn't use the mal-contraction
always nur 1345-1235
contraction nr
always nutz 1345-1356
contraction nz
always nütz 5-1345-1356

sufword ohne 135-15
contraction oe

always öffentlich 246-456

always paar = shouldn't use the ar-contraction
always paragraph 1234-1245
contraction pg
always person 1234-1345
contraction pn
always philosoph 1234-125
contraction ph
always platz 1234-1356
always plätz 5-1234-1356
always plaetz 5-1234-1356
always plötzlich 1234-456
always ploetzlich 1234-456
always politik 1234-13
contraction pk
always politisch 1234-156
always punkt 1234-2345
contraction pt

always recht 1235-2345
contraction rt
before s always rechts 1235-2345-234
always regier 1235-1245
contraction rg
before s always regierungs 1235-1245-136-234
always rehabilit 1235-125
contraction rh
always republik 1235-13
contraction rk
sufword rest 1235-15-23456 should use the st-contraction
always richt 2-3456
always rück 1235-46
always rueck 1235-46

always sag 234-1245
contraction sg
always saal = shouldn't use the al-contraction
word samen 234-1-134-14 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always satz 234-1356
contraction sz
always sätz 5-234-1356
always saetz 5-234-1356
always schnur 156-1345-136-1235 shouldn't use the nur-contraction
always school 234-1456-135-135-123 foreign word, sch-contraction not allowed
always schlag 156-1245
always schläg 5-156-1245
always schlaeg 5-156-1245
always schließ 156-2346
always schreib 156-12
always schrift 156-2345
always schrieb 2-156
always schwierig 156-45
always schwillt 156-2456-24-12345-2345 shouldn't use the will-contraction
always schwoll 156-2456-135-12345 geschwollen shouldn't use the woll-contraction
word sehr 234-1235
sufword versehr 36-234-1235
sufword unversehr 256-1236-12456-234-1235
always selbst 234-23456
always selbständig 234-13456-12-5-23456-45 shouldn't use the selbst-contraction
always selbstaendig 234-13456-12-5-23456-45 shouldn't use the selbst-contraction
always setz 2-15
sufword sesam 234-123456-1-134 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
word sind 234-145
contraction sd
always gesinde 12346-234-35-145-15
always gesindel 12346-234-35-145-13456
always gesindes 12346-234-35-145-123456
always gesindest 12346-234-35-145-15-23456

always sitz 2-24
always sitzbein 2-24-12-1246 shouldn't use the bei-contraction
always solch 234-1456
always soll 2-234
always sondern 234-1345
contraction sn
always sozial 234-123
contraction sl
always spiel 2-346
always sprach 234-1234
contraction sp
always spräch 5-234-1234
always spraech 5-234-1234
always sprech 2-2346
always staat 23456-2345
always stand 2-23456
always standard 23456-235-145-356-145 shouldn't use the stand-contraction
always ständ 5-23456
always staend 5-23456
always stell 2-13456
always sstell 234-2-13456 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
word stets 23456-234
always strahier 23456-1235-1-125-346-1235 abstrahieren
